Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB6064.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 679a. (1) For tax years beginning on and after the effective date of the amendatory act that added this section and subject to the limitations under this section, a taxpayer may claim a credit against the tax imposed by this part equal to 25% of the amount paid on a qualified student loan by the taxpayer during the tax year on behalf of a qualified employee who did not graduate from a high school located in this state or receive a bachelor's, master's, or other higher graduate degree from a postsecondary educational institution located in this state, but relocated to this state for employment with that taxpayer after obtaining a bachelor's, master's, or other higher graduate degree from a postsecondary educational institution. (2) A taxpayer shall not claim a credit under this section for payments made on a qualified student loan on behalf of any single qualified employee for any single tax year that is equal to more than 20% of the average yearly tuition to attend a public university located in this state. (3) To be eligible for the credit under this section, the taxpayer in a form as prescribed by the department shall provide reasonable proof in support of payments claimed to be paid on behalf of a qualified employee for that qualified employee's qualified student loan under this section. The form shall include, at a minimum, all of the following: (a) The taxpayer's federal employer identification number or the Michigan treasury number assigned. (b) The name, address, and graduation date of the qualified employee. (c) The date and amount of each payment made toward a qualified student loan. (d) Any other criteria that the department considers appropriate for the determination of eligibility for the credit under this section. (4) If the credit allowed under this section exceeds the qualified taxpayer's tax liability for the tax year, that portion that exceeds the tax liability for the tax year must be refunded. Enacting section 1. This amendatory act does not take effect unless all of the following bills of the 103rd Legislature are enacted into law: (a) Senate Bill No. ____ (request no. S00316'25) or House Bill No. 6061 (request no. H00316'25). (b) Senate Bill No. ____ (request no. S00317'25) or House Bill No. 6062 (request no. H00317'25). (c) Senate Bill No. ____ (request no. S01002'25) or House Bill No. 6063 (request no. H01002'25). (d) Senate Bill No. ____ (request no. S04326'25) or House Bill No. 6065 (request no. H04326'25).